Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1768.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.988, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Covenants not to compete void and unenforceable. (a) Any covenant not to compete contained in a contract or agreement is void and unenforceable. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a covenant not to compete is valid and enforceable if: new text begin (1) the covenant not to compete applies: new text end new text begin (i) to an employee who has an annual budgeted compensation of $120,000 or more and whose primary duties include: new text end new text begin (A) research and development or the creation, analysis, or modification of confidential, proprietary, or trade secret information; or new text end new text begin (B) management of a project, team, or department with responsibility over research and development or the creation, analysis, or modification of confidential, proprietary, or trade secret information; or new text end new text begin (ii) to any employee who has an annual budgeted compensation of $500,000 or more regardless of the employee's primary job duties; new text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end the covenant not to compete is agreed upon during the sale of a business. The person selling the business and the partners, members, or shareholders, and the buyer of the business may agree on a temporary and geographically restricted covenant not to compete that will prohibit the seller of the business from carrying on a similar business within a reasonable geographic area and for a reasonable length of time; or deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the covenant not to compete is agreed upon in anticipation of the dissolution of a business. The partners, members, or shareholders, upon or in anticipation of a dissolution of a partnership, limited liability company, or corporation may agree that all or any number of the parties will not carry on a similar business within a reasonable geographic area where the business has been transacted. (c) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to render void or unenforceable any other provisions in a contract or agreement containing a void or unenforceable covenant not to compete. (d) In addition to injunctive relief and any other remedies available, a court may award an employee who is enforcing rights under this section reasonable attorney fees. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end